Massachusetts, session 194th, H3173.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 100 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the
following paragraph:-
(s) “Overtime wage”, wages paid to an hourly employee for working in excess of 40
hours per week; provided, that wages earned by salaried employees shall not constitute overtime
wage.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (b) of part B of section 3 of said chapter 62, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subparagraph:-
(6) An amount equal to the overtime wages earned by the taxpayer within the taxable
year.
of 1